Utah statutes.
63G-16-101.   State sovereignty and rights of set-off.

(1)  Pursuant to the Ninth and Tenth Amendments of the Constitution of the United States of America, the state of Utah does solemnly affirm its state sovereignty and fully and unconditionally reserves and asserts all rights and powers, directly and indirectly related to those rights and powers.

(2)  This affirmation, reservation, and assertion includes rights and claims of set-off by the state of Utah for any amounts it claims to have been inequitably or unlawfully caused or imposed by the federal government.



Enacted by Chapter 38, 2012 General Session

